New York, session 2025-2026, A1989.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 861 of the tax law, as amended by 2 section 2 of subpart C of part J of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (c) The annual election must be made on or before [the due date of the 5 first estimated payment under section eight hundred sixty-four of this 6 article] September fifteenth and will take effect for the current taxa- 7 ble year. Only one election may be made during each calendar year. An 8 election made under this section is irrevocable after [the due date] 9 September fifteenth of the taxable year. 10 § 2. Subsection (b) of section 864 of the tax law, as added by section 11 1 of part C of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, paragraph 3 as amended by 12 chapter 555 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 13 (b) General. The estimated tax shall be paid as follows for an elect- 14 ing partnership and an electing S corporation: 15 (1) [The estimated tax shall be paid] For an election to be taxed 16 pursuant to this article that is made on or before March fifteenth of 17 the taxable year, the electing partnership or electing S corporation is 18 required to make estimated tax payments in four equal installments on 19 March fifteenth, June fifteenth, September fifteenth and December 20 fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year in which the due date 21 of the return required by this article falls. The amount of each 22 installment shall be twenty-five percent of the required annual payment. 23 (2) [The amount of any required installment shall be twenty-five 24 percent of the required annual payment.] For an election to be taxed EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02020-02-5 A. 1989--A 2 1 pursuant to this article that is made after March fifteenth but before 2 June fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing partnership or electing 3 S corporation is required to make an estimated tax payment with its 4 election that represents twenty-five percent of the required annual 5 payment. The electing partnership or electing S corporation shall 6 further make payments on June fifteenth, September fifteenth, and Decem- 7 ber fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year in which the due 8 date of the return required by this article falls, which shall each 9 represent twenty-five percent of the required annual payment. 10 (3) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 11 on or after June fifteenth but before September fifteenth in the taxable 12 year, the electing partnership or electing S corporation is required to 13 make an estimated tax payment with its election that represents fifty 14 percent of the required annual payment. The electing partnership or 15 electing S corporation shall further make payments on September 16 fifteenth and December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year 17 in which the due date of the return required by this article falls, 18 which shall each represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 19 payment. 20 (4) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 21 on September fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing partnership or 22 electing S corporation is required to make an estimated tax payment with 23 its election that represents seventy-five percent of the required annual 24 payment. The electing partnership or electing S corporation shall 25 further make a payment on December fifteenth in the calendar year prior 26 to the year in which the due date of the return required by this article 27 falls, which shall represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 28 payment. 29 [(3)] (5) Notwithstanding paragraph four of subsection (c) of section 30 six hundred eighty-five of this chapter, the required annual payment is 31 the lesser of: (A) ninety percent of the tax shown on the return for the 32 taxable year; or (B) one hundred percent of the tax shown on the return 33 of the electing partnership or electing S corporation for the preceding 34 taxable year. 35 § 3. Subsection (c) of section 868 of the tax law, as amended by 36 section 7 of subpart C of part J of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is 37 amended to read as follows: 38 (c) The annual election to be taxed pursuant to this article must be 39 made on or before [the due date of the first estimated payment under 40 section eight hundred sixty-four of this chapter] September fifteenth 41 and will take effect for the current taxable year. Only one election to 42 be taxed pursuant to this article may be made during each calendar year. 43 An election made under this section is irrevocable after [such due date] 44 September fifteenth of the taxable year. To the extent an election made 45 under section eight hundred sixty-one of this chapter is revoked or 46 otherwise invalidated an election made under this section is automat- 47 ically invalidated. 48 § 4. Subsection (b) of section 871 of the tax law, as added by section 49 1 of subpart B of part MM of chapter 59 of the laws of 2022, paragraph 3 50 as amended by chapter 555 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 51 follows: 52 (b) General. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the 53 estimated tax shall be paid as follows for an electing city partnership 54 and an electing city resident S corporation: 55 (1) [The estimated tax shall be paid] For an election to be taxed 56 pursuant to this article that is made on or before March fifteenth in A. 1989--A 3 1 the taxable year, the electing city partnership or electing city S 2 corporation is required to make estimated tax payments in four equal 3 installments on March fifteenth, June fifteenth, September fifteenth and 4 December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year in which the 5 due date of the return required by this article falls. The amount of 6 each installment shall be twenty-five percent of the required annual 7 payment. 8 (2) [The amount of any required installment shall be twenty-five 9 percent of the required annual payment.] For an election to be taxed 10 pursuant to this article that is made after March fifteenth but before 11 June fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing city partnership or 12 electing city S corporation is required to make an estimated tax payment 13 with its election that represents twenty-five percent of the required 14 annual payment. The electing city partnership or electing city S corpo- 15 ration shall further make payments on June fifteenth, September 16 fifteenth, and December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year 17 in which the due date of the return required by this article falls, 18 which shall each represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 19 payment. 20 (3) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 21 after June fifteenth but before September fifteenth in the taxable year, 22 the electing city partnership or electing city S corporation is required 23 to make an estimated tax payment with its election that represents fifty 24 percent of the required annual payment. The electing city partnership or 25 electing city S corporation shall further make payments on September 26 fifteenth and December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year 27 in which the due date of the return required by this article falls, 28 which shall each represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 29 payment. 30 (4) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 31 on September fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing city partner- 32 ship or electing city S corporation is required to make an estimated tax 33 payment with its election that represents seventy-five percent of the 34 required annual payment. The electing city partnership or electing city 35 S corporation shall further make a payment on December fifteenth in the 36 calendar year prior to the year in which the due date of the return 37 required by this article falls, which shall represent twenty-five 38 percent of the required annual payment. 39 [(3)] (5) Without regard to paragraph four of subsection (c) of 40 section six hundred eighty-five of this chapter, the required annual 41 payment is the lesser of: (A) ninety percent of the tax shown on the 42 return for the taxable year; or (B) one hundred percent of the tax shown 43 on the return of the electing city partnership or electing city resident 44 S corporation for the preceding taxable year. 45 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 46 years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.